Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-913
Sewers; resolution to construct, purchase, or acquire; contents; estimate of cost.

Whenever the city council of any city of the second class, or the board of trustees of any village, shall deem it advisable or necessary to build, reconstruct, purchase, or otherwise acquire a sanitary sewer system or a sanitary or storm water sewer, or sewers or sewage disposal plant, or pumping stations or sewer outlets for any such city or village, constructed or to be constructed in whole or in part inside or outside thereof, it shall declare the advisability and necessity therefor in a proposed resolution, which resolution, in the case of pipe sewer construction, shall state the kinds of pipe proposed to be used, and shall include cement concrete pipe and vitrified clay pipe and any other material deemed suitable, and shall state the size or sizes and kinds of sewers proposed to be constructed and shall designate the location and terminal points thereof. If it is proposed to construct disposal plants or pumping stations or outlet sewers, the resolution shall refer to the plans and specifications thereof which shall have been made and filed before the publication of such resolution by the city engineer of any such city or by the engineer who has been employed by any such city or village for such purpose. If it is proposed to purchase or otherwise acquire a sanitary sewer system or a sanitary or storm water sewer, or sewers or sewage disposal plant, or pumping stations or sewer outlets, the resolution shall state the price and conditions of the purchase or how same is being acquired. Such engineer shall also make and file, prior to the publication of such resolution, an estimate of the total cost of the proposed improvement. The proposed resolution shall state the amount of such estimated cost. The city council or board of trustees shall have power to assess, to the extent of special benefits, the cost of such portions of said improvements as are local improvements, upon properties found especially benefited thereby; and the resolution, hereinabove mentioned, shall state the outer boundaries of the district or districts in which it is proposed to make special assessments.

Laws 1919, c. 189, § 1, p. 427;

Laws 1921, c. 281, § 1, p. 926;

C.S.1922, § 4337;

Laws 1923, c. 143, § 1, p. 355;

C.S.1929, § 17-528;

R.S.1943, § 17-913;

Laws 1947, c. 39, § 1, p. 151.

Notice by mail need not be given of passage of resolution of necessity declaring advisability of constructing sewer system. Jones v. Village of Farnam, 174 Neb. 704, 119 N.W.2d 157 (1963).

Resolution of necessity should state outer boundaries of district. Hutton v. Village of Cairo, 159 Neb. 342, 66 N.W.2d 820 (1954).

Where sewer improvements are made, special assessments to pay therefor may be levied by resolution of the council and an ordinance therefor is not mandatory. Weilage v. City of Crete, 110 Neb. 544, 194 N.W. 437 (1923).

Special assessments, levied by the frontage rule, must not exceed the local benefits conferred. Hurd v. Sanitary Sewer District No. 1 of Harvard, 109 Neb. 384, 191 N.W. 438 (1922).